test/src/morphology/V-rapahutma80_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - rapahutma: # Verb (80) rapahutma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     rapahutma+V+Inf/mA: rapahutma
     rapahutma+V+Inf: rapahutaq
     rapahutma+V+ActPrtPrc: rapahutnuq
     rapahutma+V+PssPrtPrc: rapahudõt
     rapahutma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: rapahuda
     rapahutma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: rapahut
     rapahutma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: rapahudi
     rapahutma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: rapahuç
